src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Paamese verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! Nothing has been done so far.

LEXICON v3
+V:a v3_X  ;
+V:a v3_Y  ;
+V:aa v3_Z  ;

LEXICON v3_X
# ;

LEXICON v3_Y
+Sg3:%>e # ;

LEXICON v3_Z
+Par:%>e # ;
+Der/N:%>ene inal ;

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
