src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Paamese language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
va v3 "go" ;
kilea:kile v3 "know, understand" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
